Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-53] General actions to achieve
objectives. To achieve the objectives of the biosecurity program, the
department shall plan for and, within available legislative appropriations,
implement the following:

(1) Work with government agencies and agricultural
commodity exporters of other states and countries to establish pre-entry
inspection programs under which inbound cargo into the State is inspected at
the ports of departure or other points outside the State;

(2) Establish, operate, or participate in operating
port-of-entry facilities where multiple government agencies may inspect,
quarantine, fumigate, disinfect, destroy, or exclude as appropriate, articles that
may harbor pests or exclude articles that are prohibited or restricted without
a permit, with the goals of:

(A) Performing inspections in an efficient,
effective, and expeditious manner for the government agencies involved and for
cargo owners, carriers, and importers; and

(B) Providing for the proper and safe storage
and handling of cargo, especially agricultural and food commodities, awaiting
inspection;

(3) Develop, implement, and coordinate post-entry
measures to eradicate, control, reduce, and suppress pests and, as appropriate,
eradicate or seize and dispose of prohibited or restricted organisms without a
permit that have entered the State;

(4) Collaborate with relevant government agencies,
agricultural commodity importers, and other persons to examine and develop
joint integrated systems to better implement the biosecurity program;

(5) Improve cargo inspection capabilities and
methods, including enhancement of the content and submission requirements for
cargo manifests and agricultural commodity ownership and movement certificates;

(6) Promote the production of agricultural commodities
in the State to reduce cargo shipments of imported commodities into the State;
and

(7) Provide public education on the negative effects
of pests and prohibited or restricted organisms without a permit, to the
environment and economy of the State. [L 2008, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next